Utah statutes.
79-5-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Board of Parks and Recreation.

(2)  "Council" means the Recreational Trails Advisory Council.

(3)  "Division" means the Division of Parks and Recreation.

(4)  "Recreational trail" or "trail" means a multi-use path used for:

(a)  muscle-powered activities, including:

(i)  bicycling;

(ii)  cross-country skiing;

(iii)  walking;

(iv)  jogging; and

(v)  horseback riding; and

(b)  uses compatible with the uses described in Subsection (4)(a).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

